Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CLEAN OUT AND REESTABLISH EARTHEN DAMS.new text end new text begin (a) $1,250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the clean water fund to the Board of Water and Soil Resources for grants in equal amounts to Fillmore, Goodhue, Houston, Wabasha, and Winona Counties to clean out and reestablish upslope earthen dams and associated earthen flood protection storage structures. new text end new text begin (b) By October 1, 2026, a county that receives a grant under this section must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources on the use of the grant. new text end new text begin (c) No portion of the appropriation in this section may be retained by the Board of Water and Soil Resources or a county to pay for administrative costs. new text end